Utah statutes.
31A-17-612.   Severability clause.
If any provision of this part, or the application of the part to any person or
circumstance, is held invalid, the determination may not affect the provisions
or applications of this part that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this part are
severable.
